Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-29,109
Action by Attorney General.

The Attorney General may maintain an action to restrain a foreign limited cooperative association from transacting business in this state in violation of the Nebraska Limited Cooperative Association Act.

Laws 2007, LB368, § 109.